Hawaii statutes.
§346-35 Cancellation or revision. If,
at any time during the currency or continuance of public assistance, the
recipient, or any person legally liable for the support of the recipient
becomes possessed of any property or income in addition to that available at
the time the grant was made, the department of human services may, for such
cause or for any other like cause, either cancel the assistance or change the
amount thereof. [L 1941, c 296, pt of §1; RL 1945, §4840; RL 1955, §108-21; HRS
§346-35; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Case Notes

Income tax refund is not "income". 396 F. Supp.
375 (1975).

State welfare manual regulations held to violate federal
regulations regarding payment of benefits while termination of benefits hearing
is pending. 434 F. Supp. 1173 (1977); 434 F. Supp. 1177 (1977).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next